Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 4. Resort and Restaurant Liquor Licenses

§ 12-4-401.
Resort retail liquor licenses; authorized; qualifications; provision for licenses issued prior to January 1, 1980.

The appropriate licensing authority in a county, city or town may issue resort retail liquor licenses to applicants who are owners or lessees of a resort complex where the resort complex satisfies the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.

To qualify for a resort retail liquor license, the appropriate licensing authority shall require the resort complex to:

Have an actual valuation of, or the applicant shall have committed or expended on the complex, not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00), excluding the value of the land;

Include a restaurant and a convention facility, which convention facility shall seat no less than one hundred (100) persons; and

Include motel, hotel or privately owned condominium, town house or home accommodations approved for short term occupancy with a minimum of one hundred (100) sleeping rooms; or

and (B) Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 49 § 2.

Without being required to meet the standards of paragraph (iii) of this subsection, be a ski resort facility open to the general public in which the applicant shall have committed or expended on the facility not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00).

Nothing contained within this section shall have any effect on resort liquor licenses issued prior to January 1, 1980, or to the right or renewal of a resort liquor license.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 155, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-34.10; Laws 1971, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-144; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 2012, ch. 77, § 1; 2015 ch. 49, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (b)(iii), added “either” and subsection designator (A); added “or” at the end of (b)(iii)(A), and added (b)(iii)(B).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “where the resort complex satisfies the requirements” for “meeting qualifications”; rewrote (b)(iii); repealed former (b)(iii)(A) and (b)(iii)(B), pertaining to qualifying hotels, motels, and ski resort facilities; and added (b)(iv).

§ 12-4-402.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 155, § 3, related to criteria for the issuance of a resort retail liquor license.

§ 12-4-403.
Population formula not applicable; contracting for services.

The provisions authorizing resort liquor licenses have no application to the population formula limiting retail liquor licenses as provided by W.S.

12-4-201

.

A resort liquor licensee may contract or subcontract for the provision of food and beverage services on the licensed premises. However, the resort liquor licensee shall remain subject to all applicable laws, rules, regulations and penalties including the provisions of W.S.

12-2-306

and

12-7-103

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 155, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 12-34.12; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-146; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 2015 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), added the present last two sentences.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "contracting for services" for "transfer" in the section heading; and rewrote (b), which read, "No resort liquor license may be transferred to another location. License ownership may be transferred to a purchaser or licensee of the licensed premises with the approval of the licensing authority. No transfer of a resort liquor license shall be required where the license is used by a person with whom the licensee has contracted or subcontracted for the provision of food and beverage services on the licensed premises. However, the resort liquor licensee shall remain subject to all applicable laws, rules, regulations and penalties including the provisions of W.S.

12-2-306

and

12-7-103

."

§ 12-4-404.
Sale of beverages for off-premises consumption prohibited.

Resort liquor licensees shall not sell alcoholic or malt beverages for consumption off the premises owned or leased by the licensee, except pursuant to a catering permit. The dispensing of alcoholic or malt beverages licensed to be sold hereunder shall be controlled by W.S.

12-5-201

and if a catering permit has been issued by W.S. 12-4-502(b).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 155, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 12-34.13; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-147, Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 2001, ch. 57, § 1.

§ 12-4-405.
Annual fee.

The annual fee for a resort liquor license shall be not less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 155, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 12-34.14; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-148; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2.

§ 12-4-406.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 155, § 6, related to other applicable provisions.

§ 12-4-407.
Restaurant liquor license; authorized.

Restaurants as defined by W.S. 12-1-101(a)(xiv) may be licensed by the appropriate licensing authority in counties, cities and towns under a restaurant liquor license. In addition to the application requirements required by this title, the license applicant shall submit a valid food service permit upon application. Population formulas have no application to issuance of restaurant liquor licenses within the county.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 92, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 50, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 3; 1989, ch. 133, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 50, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “12-4-201(d)” for “12-4-201(c) or (d), whichever is applicable” in (c).

Laws 2006 ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “subsection (c)” for “subsections (b) and (c)” in (d).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c), deleted “the 1980 census has been completed and” before “the maximum number.”

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (a) and (c).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 50, §
1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), deleted “When the total dollar amount of wholesale purchases from the division of liquor in a county is greater than fifty (50) times the county population, then” following “permit upon application,” and made a related change; and deleted the last sentence of (d), which read: “Licenses issued under this subsection shall not be considered in the number of licenses authorized under subsection (c) of this section.”

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 50, §
2, effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (c), which read: “After the maximum number of appropriate licenses has been certified by the commission division, the number of restaurant liquor licenses issued shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the number of retail liquor licenses allowable under
W.S. 12-4-201(d), or two (2), whichever is greater.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “set pursuant to
W.S.

12-5-101

” for “specified by
W.S.

12-5-101

(a),” deleted “specified therein” at the end of the sentence, and made a stylistic change.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) inserted “from the license building” and made a stylistic change; in (b), substituted “by the local licensing authority” for as provided in
W.S. 12-5-201(a)”; and added (f).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, repealed (d), which read, "Any person presently holding a limited retail liquor license and otherwise qualified for a restaurant liquor license under W.S. 12-1-101(a)(xiv) and

12-4-407

through

12-4-411

may be issued a restaurant liquor license by the appropriate licensing authority."

§ 12-4-408.
Revenues of licensee to be derived primarily from food services and not the sale of alcoholic beverages; annual report.

An applicant for a restaurant liquor license shall satisfy the appropriate licensing authority that the primary source of revenue from the operation of the restaurant to be licensed will be derived from food services and not from the sale of alcoholic or malt beverages.

When renewing a restaurant liquor license, the appropriate licensing authority shall condition renewal upon a requirement that not less than sixty percent (60%) of gross sales from the preceding twelve (12) months operation of a licensed restaurant be derived from food services.

Upon application for license renewal, a license holder shall submit an annual report to the licensing authority on the sales of the licensed restaurant. The report shall contain the annual gross sales figures of the restaurant and shall separate the gross sales figures into two (2) categories:

Food service sales; and

Alcoholic and malt beverage sales.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1.

§ 12-4-409.
Transfer of licenses. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 12-4-410.
Sale of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption prohibited; location, regulation and restrictions on dispensing of liquor; prohibiting certain activities.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, restaurant liquor licensees shall not sell alcoholic or malt beverages for off-premises consumption from the licensed building owned or leased by the licensee. Except as provided in subsections (b) and (e) of this section, alcoholic or malt beverages shall be served for on-premises consumption only in dining areas which are adequately staffed and equipped for all food services offered by the restaurant.

Alcoholic liquor and malt beverages shall be dispensed and prepared for consumption in the licensed building in areas approved by the local licensing authority. No consumption of alcoholic or malt beverages shall be permitted within the dispensing areas nor shall any person other than employees over eighteen (18) years of age be permitted to enter the dispensing areas.

All sales of alcoholic and malt beverages authorized by a restaurant liquor license shall cease at the time food sales and services cease or at the hours set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

if food sales and services extend beyond those hours.

No restaurant liquor licensee shall promote or operate the restaurant as a bar and lounge.

A restaurant liquor licensee may permit a patron to remove one (1) unsealed bottle of wine for off-premises consumption provided that the patron has purchased a full course meal and consumed a portion of the bottle of wine with the meal on the restaurant premises. For purposes of this subsection the term “full course meal” shall mean a diversified selection of food which is ordinarily consumed with the use of tableware and cannot conveniently be consumed while standing or walking. A partially consumed bottle of wine that is to be removed from the premises pursuant to this subsection shall be securely sealed by the licensee or an agent of the licensee and placed in a tamper-proof transparent bag which shall also be securely sealed prior to removal from the premises, so that it is visibly apparent that the resealed bottle of wine has not been tampered with. The licensee or agent of the licensee shall provide a dated receipt for the bottle of wine to the patron. Wine which is resealed in accordance with the provisions of this subsection shall not be deemed an open container for purposes of W.S.

31-5-235

.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 3.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1989, ch. 133, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 1995, ch. 88, § 1; 1999, ch. 21, § 1; 2005, ch. 92, § 1; 2013 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 22, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), added the exception language at the beginning and updated an internal reference; and added (e).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (b) inserted “and one (1) additional room if authorized and approved as provided in W.S. 12-5-201(a).”

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

” for “specified by W.S.

12-5-101

(a),” deleted “specified therein” at the end of the sentence, and made a stylistic change.

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) inserted “from the licensed building” and made a stylistic change; in (b), substituted “by the local licensing authority” for as provided in W.S. 12-5-201(a)”; and added (f).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both are given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote (b), which read, "Alcoholic and malt beverages shall be dispensed and prepared for consumption in one (1) room, and one (1) additional room if authorized and approved by the local licensing authority, upon the licensed premises separated from the dining area in which alcoholic and malt beverages may be served and in the case of a golf course upon which a restaurant liquor license is operational or in the case of a guest ranch upon which a retail or restaurant liquor license is operational, at dispensing areas on the premises of the golf course or guest ranch as permitted by the licensing authority. No consumption of alcoholic or malt beverages shall be permitted within the dispensing room, nor shall any person other than employees over eighteen (18) years of age be permitted to enter the dispensing room. If a restaurant has a dispensing room separate from the dining area which is licensed prior to February 1, 1979 for purposes of alcoholic or malt beverage sales and consumption, the restaurant may dispense alcoholic or malt beverages in the separate dispensing room under a restaurant liquor license, and any person over eighteen (18) years of age is permitted to enter the separate dispensing room"; in (d), added "or operate" and deleted "nor shall the licensee compete with a retail liquor licensee in activities other than dinner functions, including, but not limited to, dances, receptions and other social gatherings.
Nothing in this subsection shall require a restaurant liquor licensee to reconstruct or remodel licensed premises existing on or before June 8, 1989" at the end.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (f), which read, "For purposes of this section, 'room' means, as approved by the local licensing authority, an enclosed and partitioned space within a building large enough for a person to enter but not a cabinet. Partitions may contain windows and doorways, but any partition shall extend from floor to ceiling."

§ 12-4-411.
License fee.

The annual fee for a restaurant liquor license shall be no more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) and no less than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 156, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted the second sentence, which read, "The license fee for a county restaurant liquor license within five (5) miles of a city or town shall not be less than the restaurant liquor license fee charged by that city or town."

§ 12-4-412.
Microbrewery and winery permits; authorized; conditions; dual permits and licenses; satellite winery permits; direct shipment of wine; fees. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 74, § 1; 1995, ch. 65, § 1; 1996, ch. 122, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 44, § 1; 2006, ch. 8, § 1; ch. 106, § 2; 2015 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 50, §
1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 158, § 1, effective February 28, 2019; 2020 ch. 132, § 1, effective March 24, 2020; 2020 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; repealed by 2021 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

§ 12-4-413.
Bar and grill liquor license; authorized; requirements.

Restaurants as defined by W.S. 12-1-101(a)(xiv) may be licensed by the appropriate licensing authority in counties, cities and towns under a bar and grill liquor license. In addition to the application requirements required by this title, the license applicant shall submit a valid food service permit upon application.

The number of bar and grill liquor licenses for cities and towns shall be based on the following population formula:

Not more than two (2) licenses in incorporated cities or towns of seven thousand five hundred (7,500) or less; and

Not more than six (6) licenses for population in incorporated cities between seven thousand five hundred one (7,501) and twenty thousand (20,000); and

Not more than ten (10) licenses for population in incorporated cities between twenty thousand one (20,001) and thirty thousand (30,000); and

Not more than one (1) additional license for each additional seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population in incorporated cities over thirty thousand (30,000).

Bar and grill liquor licenses may be granted by the county commissioners as the appropriate licensing authority in a county outside of incorporated cities and towns as follows:

One (1) license for each seven thousand five hundred (7,500) population residing outside incorporated cities and towns.

The license fee assessed for a bar and grill liquor license shall be not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) nor more than ten thousand five hundred dollars ($10,500.00).

A bar and grill liquor license shall not be sold, transferred or assigned by the holder.

Bar and grill liquor licenses shall be subject to the provisions of W.S.

12-4-408

and 12-4-410(c) to the same extent those provisions are applicable to restaurant liquor licenses. Bar and grill liquor licensees shall not sell alcoholic or malt beverages for off-premises consumption from the licensed building owned or leased by the licensee except as allowed under W.S. 12-4-410(e).

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 106, § 1; 2011, ch. 22, § 1; ch. 176, § 1; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 138, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, substituted “two (2) licenses” for “one (1) license,” and added “and” at the end of (b)(i); in (b)(ii), substituted “three (3)” for “two (2)”; in (b)(iii), substituted “four (4) licenses” for “three (3)”; and in (b)(iv), substituted “seven thousand five hundred (7,500)” for “twelve thousand five hundred (12,500).”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the second sentence of (f), inserted “from the licensed building,” and made a stylistic change.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 138, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(ii), substituted “six (6) licenses” for “three (3) licenses” and substituted “twenty thousand (20,000)” for “fifteen thousand (15,000)”; in (b)(iii), substituted “ten (10) licenses” for “four (4) licenses” and substituted “between twenty thousand one (20,001) and thirty thousand (30,000)” for “between fifteen thousand one (15,001) and twenty-seven thousand five hundred (27,500)”; and in (b)(iv), substituted “over thirty thousand (30,000)” for “over twenty-seven thousand five hundred (27,500).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 106, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 12-4-414.
Winery permits; authorized; conditions; satellite winery permits; direct shipment of wine; fees; off-premises permits.

Subject to restrictions imposed under W.S.

12-4-103

excluding W.S.

12-4-103

(a)(vi), a local licensing authority may issue a winery permit authorizing a permit holder to manufacture wine and dispense the manufactured wine for on-premises and limited off-premises personal consumption.

The local licensing authority:

May allow the sale of other wines under a winery permit for on-premises consumption when obtained from the division;

May allow the winery to sell its manufactured wine on site for off-premises personal consumption, not for retail sale, in packaging of bottles of an aggregate volume not to exceed two thousand twenty-eight (2,028) ounces per sale;

In accordance with the process established under article 1 of this chapter, may allow the transfer of a winery permit to another location and ownership of the winery may be transferred upon approval by the local licensing authority;

Shall assess a fee of not less than three hundred dollars ($300.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) payable annually in advance for each winery permit. When dual ownership of a winery permit and a liquor license exists no additional fee shall be assessed other than the retail, restaurant, bar and grill or resort license fee.

W.S.

12-4-410

shall apply to any person holding a winery permit and a restaurant liquor license and W.S.

12-4-413

shall apply to any person holding a winery permit and a bar and grill liquor license, except that either dual holder:

May sell the manufactured wine for limited off-premises personal consumption pursuant to paragraph (b)(ii) of this section;

May upon cessation of full service restaurant operations, serve a limited menu and continue to serve wines authorized under the winery permit;

Shall not include sales of wines authorized under the winery permit, or sales other than food service and alcoholic beverages, in the annual gross sales report required under W.S. 12-4-408(c).

A local licensing authority may issue to the holder of a winery permit under this section a satellite winery permit which allows the permittee to sell wine manufactured at the site identified on the manufacturer’s license at up to three (3) satellite locations within Wyoming separate from its licensed manufacturing site under the original permit fee. The satellite winery permit may be issued on application to the appropriate licensing authority. The local licensing authority may require a public hearing and the payment of an additional permit fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) regardless of the number of satellite locations. The satellite winery permit shall be subject to the terms and conditions of W.S.

12-4-106

, the schedule of operating hours set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

and the licensed building provisions of W.S.

12-5-201

.

Notwithstanding paragraph (b)(ii) of this section and W.S.

12-5-201

, any person holding a winery permit as provided by this section, may sell and ship its manufactured wine which is not listed with the liquor division as part of its inventory and distribution operation to any Wyoming retail establishment which holds a liquor license in this state.

Any licensed winery holding a winery permit pursuant to this section shall:

Not ship more than a total of one hundred eight (108) liters of its manufactured wine to any one (1) household in this state during any twelve (12) month period;

Offer to sell its manufactured wine to the liquor division at wholesale prices if the winery ships more than ninety (90) liters total of any of its manufactured wine to any combination of households or licensed retailers in this state;

Ship its manufactured wine only to individuals who are at least twenty-one (21) years of age for such individual’s personal use and not for resale;

Ensure that all shipping containers of manufactured wine shipped pursuant to this section are conspicuously labeled with the words: “CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES. ADULT (OVER 21) SIGNATURE REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY”;

Ensure that all of its shipments within this state are made by a duly licensed carrier and further ensure that such carriers comply with the requirement to obtain an adult signature;

File a monthly report of wines shipped out of state on a form provided by the liquor division and include a copy of the invoice for each shipment of their own manufactured wine subject to the following:

The report shall be filed with the liquor division not later than the tenth day of each month following the month in which the shipment was made;

Any report filed late with the liquor division shall be subject to a late filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Maintain records for at least three (3) years that will permit the liquor division to ascertain the truthfulness of the information filed and permit the division to perform an audit of the licensee’s records upon reasonable request.

The local licensing authority may issue to a winery permit holder an off-premises wine permit for the purpose of selling its own manufactured wine at meetings, conventions, private parties, dinners and other similar gatherings to promote the holder’s product. No permittee holding an off-premises wine permit shall sell or permit consumption of any of their manufactured product off the premises described in the permit. An off-premises wine permit shall be issued for one (1) twenty-four (24) hour period, subject to the schedule of operating hours set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

. No holder of a wine permit shall receive more than twelve (12) off-premises wine permits in any one (1) calendar year. An off-premises wine permit may be issued on application to the appropriate licensing authority. The local licensing authority may require payment of an additional permit fee of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) per twenty-four (24) hour period.

The holder of a winery permit under this section may also hold a manufacturer’s license under W.S. 12-2-203(a).

History.

2021 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (g) and (h).

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 12-4-415.
Microbrewery permits; authorized; conditions; fees.

Subject to restrictions imposed under W.S.

12-4-103

excluding W.S.

12-4-103

(a)(vi), a local licensing authority may issue a microbrewery permit authorizing a permit holder to brew a malt beverage and dispense the brewed malt beverage for on-premises and limited off-premises personal consumption. Notwithstanding W.S.

12-5-201

and for the purposes of this subsection, “on-premises” may include a fenced or enclosed area immediately adjacent to the licensed brewing site as approved by the local licensing authority. The dispensing of malt beverages in an immediately adjacent area authorized by this paragraph shall be subject to the schedule of operating hours set pursuant to W.S.

12-5-101

. Any microbrewery permit holder shall:

File a monthly report of brewed malt beverage the permit holder produced on a form provided by the liquor division. The report shall be filed with the liquor division not later than the tenth day of each month following the month in which the brewed malt beverage was produced. Any report filed late with the liquor division shall be subject to a late filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

Maintain records for at least three (3) years that will permit the liquor division to ascertain the truthfulness of the information filed and permit the division to perform an audit of the licensee’s records upon reasonable request.

The local licensing authority:

May allow the sale of malt beverage obtained through a contract brewing arrangement and other malt beverages under a microbrewery permit for on-premises consumption when obtained through licensed wholesale malt beverage distributors;

May allow the microbrewery to sell on site its brewed product and its malt beverage obtained through a contract brewing arrangement for off-premises personal consumption, not for retail sale, in packaging of bottles, cans or packs of an aggregate volume not to exceed two thousand (2,000) ounces per sale;

In accordance with the process established under article 1 of this chapter, may allow the transfer of a microbrewery permit to another location and ownership of the microbrewery may be transferred upon approval by the local licensing authority; and

Shall assess a fee of not less than three hundred dollars ($300.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) payable annually in advance for each microbrewery permit. When dual ownership of a microbrewery permit and a liquor license exists no additional fee shall be assessed other than the retail, restaurant, bar and grill or resort license fee.

W.S.

12-4-410

shall apply to any person holding a microbrewery permit and a restaurant liquor license and W.S.

12-4-413

shall apply to any person holding a microbrewery permit and a bar and grill liquor license, except that either dual holder:

May sell the brewed malt beverage for limited off-premises personal consumption pursuant to paragraph (b)(ii) of this section;

May upon cessation of full service restaurant operations, serve a limited menu and continue to serve malt beverages authorized under the microbrewery permit;

Shall not include sales of malt beverages authorized under the microbrewery permit, or sales other than food service and alcoholic beverages, in the annual gross sales report required under W.S. 12-4-408(c).

A local licensing authority may authorize a microbrewery to operate at more than one (1) location. The local licensing authority may require the payment of an additional permit fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) regardless of the number of locations authorized for the microbrewery. All locations shall be subject to all provisions of this title related to the operation of a microbrewery.

The holder of a microbrewery permit under this section may also hold a manufacturer’s license under W.S. 12-2-203(a).

History.

2021 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (e).

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 22, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.